incubator/apertium-asm/apertium-asm.asm.dix
<pardef n="নিখুঁত_n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>কৈ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>কে</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="চশমা_n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>বোৰ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ৰ</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ৰে</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ত</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>যোৰ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="গছ_n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>বোৰ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>টো</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ৰ</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>ডাল</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>



<!-- Added Saturday 17 May 2014 10:33:38 AM IST -->

   <pardef n="শক্তি_n">
      <e><p><l>শালী</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>বান</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    </pardefs>

<e lm="নিখুঁত"><i>নিখুঁত</i><par n="নিখুঁত_n"/></e>
<e lm="চশমা"><i>চশমা</i><par n="চশমা_n"/></e>
<e lm="নেজ"><i>নেজ</i><par n="গছ_n"/></e>
<e lm="গছ"><i>গছ</i><par n="গছ_n"/></e>
<e lm="বেকা"><i>বেকা</i><par n="নিখুঁত_n"/></e>
	<e lm="সাপ"><i>সাপ</i><par n="গছ_n"/></e>
